Washington statutes.
RCW 38.56.050

Death or injury of emergency responder—Benefits.

An emergency responder designated by a responding member jurisdiction under RCW 38.56.030(4), who dies or sustains an injury while providing assistance to a requesting member jurisdiction as an emergency responder under this chapter, is entitled to receive only the benefits otherwise authorized by law for death or injury sustained in the course of employment with the responding member jurisdiction. Any such benefits provided by a responding member jurisdiction to an emergency responder must be included in the true and full value of assistance provided for purposes of reimbursement under RCW 38.56.070.

[ 2011 c 79 s 5.]